hu: Játékminta: Építés / szerelés; Asztali szobrászat / művészet; Oktató / STEM; Babráló / stresszoldó; Kirakós / ördöglakat; Ügyességi játék / trükk; Egyéb
lt-LT: Žaidimo būdas: Statyba / konstravimas; Stalo skulptūra / menas; Edukacinė / STEM; Nerimo / streso malšinimas; Dėlionė / galvosūkis; Įgūdžių lavinimo / triukų žaislas; Kita
en: Play pattern: Building / construction; Desk sculpture / art; Educational / STEM; Fidget / stress relief; Puzzle / brain teaser; Skill toy / trick; Other
nl: Speelpatroon: Bouwen / constructie; Bureausculptuur / kunst; Educatief / STEM; Fidget / stressverlichting; Puzzel / hersenkraker; Behendigheidsspeelgoed / trucs; Overig
zh-CN: 玩法模式: 建筑/拼搭; 桌面雕塑/艺术; 教育 / STEM; 减压/解压; 拼图/烧脑游戏; 技巧玩具/魔术; 其他
da: Legemønster: Bygning/konstruktion; Skrivebordsskulptur/kunst; Lærerigt / STEM; Fidget/afstresning; Puslespil/hjernevrider; Færdighedslegetøj/trick; Andet
th: รูปแบบการเล่น: การต่อประกอบ/ก่อสร้าง; ประติมากรรมตั้งโต๊ะ/ศิลปะ; เสริมการเรียนรู้/STEM; ของเล่นฟิดเจ็ต/แก้ความเครียด; ปริศนา/ลับสมอง; ของเล่นเสริมทักษะ/เล่นท่า; อื่นๆ
it: Fantasia di gioco: Costruzioni / assemblaggio; Sculture da scrivania / arte; Educativo / STEM; Fidget / antistress; Puzzle / rompicapo; Giocattolo di destrezza / acrobazie; Altro
vi: Mô hình chơi: Xây dựng/lắp ráp; Điêu khắc/nghệ thuật để bàn; Giáo dục/STEM; Đồ chơi xả stress/giảm căng thẳng; Câu đố/thử thách trí não; Đồ chơi kỹ năng/mẹo; Khác
tr: Oyun deseni: Yapım/inşaat; Masa heykeli/sanat; Eğitici/STEM; Fidget/stres atma; Yapboz/zeka oyunu; Beceri oyuncağı/numara; Diğer
hr-HR: Obrazac igre: Građenje/konstrukcija; Skulptura za stol / umjetnost; Edukativno/STEM; Fidget / oslobađanje od stresa; Slagalice / mozgalice; Igračka za vještine / trik; Ostalo
ru: Сценарий игры: Сборка / конструирование; Настольная скульптура / искусство; Образование / STEM; Фиджет / снятие стресса; Головоломка / логическая игра; Игрушка для развития навыков / трюков; Другое
sk-SK: Šablóna hry: Stavanie / konštrukcie; Stolové sochy / umenie; Vzdelávacie / STEM; Antistresové hračky / odbúranie stresu; Hlavolamy; Hračky zručnosti / triky; Iné
sv: Spelmönster: Bygga / konstruera; Skrivbordsskulptur / konst; Lärorikt / STEM; Fidget / stresslindring; Pussel / knep och knåp; Färdighetsleksak / tricks; Övrigt
pt-BR: Brincadeira, tipo: Construção / montagem; Escultura de mesa / arte; Educativo / STEM; Fidget / alívio de estresse; Quebra-cabeça / desafio mental; Brinquedo de habilidade / truque; Outro
ja: プレイパターン: 組み立て / 構築; デスク彫刻 / アート; 知育 / STEM; フィジェット / ストレス解消; パズル / 頭の体操; スキルトイ / トリック; その他
bg-BG: Модел на игра: Строителство / конструиране; Скулптура за бюро / изкуство; Образователни / STEM; Фиджет / облекчаване на стреса; Пъзел / логическа задача; Играчка за умения / трик; Други
es: Patrón de juego: Construcción; Escultura de escritorio/arte; Educativo/STEM; Fidget/alivio del estrés; Rompecabezas/juego de ingenio; Juguete de habilidad/truco; Otro
el: Μοτίβο παιχνιδιού: Κατασκευή; Γλυπτό γραφείου / τέχνη; Εκπαιδευτικό / STEM; Fidget / ανακούφιση από το άγχος; Παζλ / σπαζοκεφαλιά; Παιχνίδι δεξιοτήτων / κόλπο; Άλλο
fr: Schéma de jeu: Bâtiment / construction; Sculpture de bureau / art; Éducatif / STEM; Fidget / soulagement du stress; Casse-tête / jeu de réflexion; Jouet d’adresse / tour; Autre
sl-SI: Vzorec igre: Gradnja/sestavljanje; Namizna skulptura / umetnost; Izobraževalno/STEM; Igrača za nemirne prste / sproščanje stresa; Sestavljanka / miselna igra; Igrača za spretnost/trik; Drugo
nb: Lekemønster: Bygging/konstruksjon; Skrivebordsskulptur / kunst; Lærerikt / STEM; Fidget / stressavlastning; Puslespill / hjernetrim; Ferdighetsleke/triks; Annet
ko: 놀이 패턴: 빌딩/건축; 데스크 조각/예술; 교육/STEM; 피젯/스트레스 해소; 퍼즐/브레인 티저; 스킬 장난감/트릭; 기타
de: Spielmuster: Bauen / Konstruktion; Schreibtisch-Skulptur / Kunst; Lehrreich / MINT; Fidget / Stressabbau; Puzzle / Denkspiel; Geschicklichkeitsspielzeug / Trick; Sonstige
cs: Herní schéma: Stavitelství / konstrukce; Stolní sochy / umění; Vzdělávací / STEM; Fidget / úleva od stresu; Puzzle / hlavolamy; Dovednostní hračky / triky; Jiné
fi: Leikkikuvio: Rakentaminen / kokoaminen; Pöytäveistos / taide; Opettavainen / STEM; Fidget / stressin lievitys; Pulmapeli / aivopähkinä; Taitolelu / temppu; Muu
zh-TW: 遊玩模式: 建築 / 拼裝; 桌面雕塑 / 藝術; 教育 / STEM; 舒壓玩具 / 減壓; 拼圖 / 益智玩具; 技巧玩具 / 特技; 其他
ro-RO: Tiparul de joc: Construire / asamblare; Sculptură de birou / artă; Educațional / STEM; Fidget / antistres; Puzzle / joc de inteligență; Jucărie de îndemânare / truc; Altele
pl: Wzorzec zabawy: Budowanie / konstruowanie; Rzeźba na biurko / sztuka; Edukacyjne / STEM; Fidget / na stres; Puzzle / łamigłówki; Zabawka zręcznościowa / sztuczki; Inne
pt-PT: Forma de brincar: Construção; Escultura de secretária/arte; Educativo/STEM; Antistress; Quebra-cabeças; Brinquedo de destreza/truques; Outro